Wyoming, session 2025, HB0168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxxii) and by renumbering paragraph (xxxii) as
(xxxiii), 35-7-111(a) by creating a new paragraph (xiv) and
35-7-125(a) are amended to read:

35-7-110. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:
HB0168

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0277

(xxxii) "Cultivated meat" means meat that is
grown entirely in a laboratory from cultured animal cells
rather than harvested from an animal;

(xxxii) (xxxiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-7-109
through 35-7-126.

35-7-111. Prohibited acts.

(a) No person shall:

(xiv) Manufacture for sale, sell, offer for sale
or distribute for sale cultivated meat in this state.

35-7-125. Summary suspension of a license.

(a) A regulatory authority may summarily suspend a
license to operate a food establishment if it determines
through consultation with a health officer, inspection,
examination of food, employees, records or other authorized
means that an establishment is manufacturing for sale,
selling, offering for sale or distributing for sale
HB0168

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0277
cultivated meat or an imminent health hazard exists
including, but not limited to, fire, flood, extended
interruption of electrical or water service, or sewage
backup.

Section 2. The department of agriculture shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0168